incubator/apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="/byť__vbser">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>byť</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>

     <!-- Present -->
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>som</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>si</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>je</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>sme</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ste</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>sú</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    <!-- Past -->
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>bol</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>bola</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>bolo</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>boli</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     
     <!-- Future -->
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>budem</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>budeš</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>bude</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>budeme</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>budete</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>budú</l>
         <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>buď</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>buďme</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>buďte</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="p/ivo__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivo</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iva</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivu</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivo</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivom</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivá</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ív</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivám</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivá</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivách</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivami</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="m/esto__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esto</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esta</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estu</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esto</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>este</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estom</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>está</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iest</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estám</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>está</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estách</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estami</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="mat/ka__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ky</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kou</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ky</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iek</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kám</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ky</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kách</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>

    <e lm="byť"><i/><par n="/byť__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="pivo"><i>p</i><par n="p/ivo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesto"><i>m</i><par n="m/esto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matka"><i>mat</i><par n="mat/ka__n"/></e>
